South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S906.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Wildlife Management Area Regulations; Turkey Hunting Rules and Seasons, designated as Regulation Document Number 5441, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Natural Resources is proposing to amend the existing regulations that set seasons, bag limits and methods of hunting and taking of wildlife. These amendments set seasons for new Wildlife Management Areas. The following is a section-by-section summary of the proposed changes and additions. The Notice of Drafting was published in Volume 49, Issue No. 9 of the South Carolina State Register on September 26, 2025. ----XX----